Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-582
Class IV school district; secretary of the board of education; duties.

The secretary of the board of education of a Class IV school district shall (1) be present at all meetings of the board of education, (2) keep an accurate journal of its proceedings, and (3) perform all other duties the board of education may require.

Laws 1917, c. 225, § 11, p. 552;

C.S.1922, § 6620;

C.S.1929, § 79-2611;

R.S.1943, § 79-2611;

Laws 1949, c. 269, § 2, p. 884;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 213, p. 761;

R.S.1943, (1971), § 79-526;

Laws 1971, LB 450, § 5;

Laws 1986, LB 84, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-909;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 335.